Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-263.01
Water; molesting or damaging measuring device; penalty.

Any person, or persons, who shall molest, tamper with, break into or damage in any way any device used for the measuring and recording of the water flowing in any stream, canal or reservoir in this state shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1947, c. 172, § 3, p. 522;

Laws 1969, c. 385, § 1, p. 1353;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 260.